Illinois, session 104th, HB4121.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the End the 5Energy Tax Act. 6    (20 ILCS 605/605-1075 rep.)7    Section 2. The Department of Commerce and Economic 8Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 9is amended by repealing Section 605-1075. 10    (20 ILCS 3855/Act rep.)11    Section 5. The Illinois Power Agency Act is repealed. 12    Section 10. The Public Utilities Revenue Act is amended by 13changing Sections 2a.1 and 2a.2 as follows: 14    (35 ILCS 620/2a.1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 469a.1)15    Sec. 2a.1. Imposition of tax on invested capital and on 16distribution of electricity.17    (a) In addition to the tax imposed by the Illinois Income 18Tax Act, there is hereby imposed upon every taxpayer (other 19than an electric cooperative, a school district or unit of 20local government as defined in Section 1 of Article VII of the   HB4121- 2 -LRB104 15314 AAS 28468 b1Illinois Constitution of 1970), an additional tax as follows: 2        (i) For the first 500,000,000 kilowatt-hours 3    distributed by the taxpayer in this State during the 4    taxable period, 0.031 cents per kilowatt-hour; 5        (ii) For the next 1,000,000,000 kilowatt-hours 6    distributed by the taxpayer in this State during the 7    taxable period, 0.050 cents per kilowatt-hour; 8        (iii) For the next 2,500,000,000 kilowatt-hours 9    distributed by the taxpayer in this State during the 10    taxable period, 0.070 cents per kilowatt-hour; 11        (iv) For the next 4,000,000,000 kilowatt-hours 12    distributed by the taxpayer in this State during the 13    taxable period, 0.140 cents per kilowatt-hour; 14        (v) For the next 7,000,000,000 kilowatt-hours 15    distributed by the taxpayer in this State during the 16    taxable period, 0.180 cents per kilowatt-hour; 17        (vi) For the next 3,000,000,000 kilowatt-hours 18    distributed by the taxpayer in this State during the 19    taxable period, 0.142 cents per kilowatt-hour; and 20        (vii) For all kilowatt-hours distributed by the 21    taxpayer in this State during the taxable period in excess 22    of 18,000,000,000 kilowatt-hours, 0.131 cents per 23    kilowatt-hour.24    (b) There is imposed on electric cooperatives that are 25required to file reports with the Rural Utilities Service a 26tax equal to 0.8% of such cooperative's invested capital for   HB4121- 3 -LRB104 15314 AAS 28468 b1the taxable period. The invested capital tax imposed by this 2subsection shall not be imposed on electric cooperatives not 3required to file reports with the Rural Utilities Service.4    (c) If, for any taxable period, the total amount received 5by the Department from the tax imposed by subsection (a) 6exceeds $145,279,553 plus, for taxable periods subsequent to 71998, an amount equal to the lesser of (i) 5% or (ii) the 8percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 9immediately preceding taxable period, of the total amount 10received by the Department from the tax imposed by subsection 11(a) for the immediately preceding taxable period, determined 12after allowance of the credit provided for in this subsection, 13the Department shall issue credit memoranda in the aggregate 14amount of the excess to each of the taxpayers who paid any 15amount of tax under subsection (a) for that taxable period in 16the proportion which the amount paid by the taxpayer bears to 17the total amount paid by all such taxpayers. This calculation 18shall be made as of December 1 of the year following the 19immediately preceding taxable period and shall consist of only 20those returns with payment then on file with the Department. 21All future amendments to returns and monies covering this 22period received after December 1 of the year following the 23taxable period will not be included in the calculation of the 24affected taxable period or any other taxable period. The 25provisions of this subsection are not subject to the Uniform 26Penalty and Interest Act. Any credit memorandum issued to a   HB4121- 4 -LRB104 15314 AAS 28468 b1taxpayer under this subsection may be used as a credit by the 2taxpayer against its liability in future taxable periods for 3tax under subsection (a). Any amount credited to a taxpayer 4shall not be refunded to the taxpayer unless the taxpayer 5demonstrates to the reasonable satisfaction of the Department 6that it will not incur future liability for tax under 7subsection (a). The Department shall adopt reasonable 8regulations for the implementation of the provisions of this 9subsection.10    (d) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 11(Source: P.A. 90-561, eff. 1-1-98; 90-624, eff. 7-10-98; 1291-357, eff. 7-29-99.) 13    (35 ILCS 620/2a.2)  (from Ch. 120, par. 469a.2)14    Sec. 2a.2. Annual return, collection and payment. A return 15with respect to the tax imposed by Section 2a.1 shall be made 16by every person for any taxable period for which such person is 17liable for such tax. Such return shall be made on such forms as 18the Department shall prescribe and shall contain the following 19information: 20        1. Taxpayer's name; 21        2. Address of taxpayer's principal place of business, 22    and address of the principal place of business (if that is 23    a different address) from which the taxpayer engages in 24    the business of distributing electricity in this State; 25        3. The total equity, in the case of electric   HB4121- 5 -LRB104 15314 AAS 28468 b1    cooperatives, in the annual reports filed with the Rural 2    Utilities Service for the taxable period; 3        3a. The total kilowatt-hours of electricity 4    distributed by a taxpayer, other than an electric 5    cooperative, in this State for the taxable period covered 6    by the return; 7        4. The amount of tax due for the taxable period 8    (computed on the basis of the amounts set forth in Items 3 9    and 3a); and 10        5. Such other reasonable information as may be 11    required by forms or regulations prescribed by the 12    Department.13    The returns prescribed by this Section shall be due and 14shall be filed with the Department not later than the 15th day 15of the third month following the close of the taxable period. 16The taxpayer making the return herein provided for shall, at 17the time of making such return, pay to the Department the 18remaining amount of tax herein imposed and due for the taxable 19period. Each taxpayer shall make estimated quarterly payments 20on the 15th day of the third, sixth, ninth and twelfth months 21of each taxable period. Such estimated payments shall be 25% 22of the tax liability for the immediately preceding taxable 23period or the tax liability that would have been imposed in the 24immediately preceding taxable period if this amendatory Act of 251979 had been in effect. All moneys received by the Department 26under Sections 2a.1 and 2a.2 shall be paid into the Personal   HB4121- 6 -LRB104 15314 AAS 28468 b1Property Tax Replacement Fund in the State Treasury.2    If any payment provided for in this Section exceeds the 3taxpayer's liabilities under this Act, as shown on an original 4return, the taxpayer may credit such excess payment against 5liability subsequently to be remitted to the Department under 6this Act, in accordance with reasonable rules adopted by the 7Department. 8    The provisions of this Section do not provide for the 9imposition of the tax under Section 2a.1. 10    This Section is repealed on January 1, 2028. 11(Source: P.A. 100-1171, eff. 1-4-19.) 12    (35 ILCS 640/Act rep.)13    Section 15. The Electricity Excise Tax Law Act is 14repealed. 15    Section 20. The Public Utilities Act is amended by adding 16Section 5-204 as follows: 17    (220 ILCS 5/5-204 new)18    Sec. 5-204. Preparation of bill. The Legislative Reference 19Bureau shall prepare for introduction in the 2027 spring 20session of the General Assembly a bill effecting such changes 21in the statutes as may be necessary to conform the statutes to 22the changes in law made by this amendatory Act of the 104th 23General Assembly.   HB4121- 7 -LRB104 15314 AAS 28468 b1    (220 ILCS 5/8-103 rep.)2    (220 ILCS 5/8-103A rep.)3    (220 ILCS 5/8-103B rep.)4    (220 ILCS 5/16-108.30 rep.)5    Section 25. The Public Utilities Act is amended by 6repealing Sections 8-103, 8-103A, 8-103B, and 16-108.30. 7    (305 ILCS 20/Act rep.)8    Section 30. The Energy Assistance Act is repealed.